src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON sis-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
! FIXME: No documentation of 2SG forms of sis-PFV verbs with /l/-initial stems.
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis3  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s3    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s3    #;


LEXICON sii-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@síí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sii   #;	
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s3    #;	
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s3    #;	

LEXICON sii-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Psis  #;
! When an inner prefix is present, 1SG forms also appear as Cas (e.g.,
! dìsists'ón ~ dasts'ón "I heard (it)", zìsisyín ~ zasyín "I killed (it)".
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@as    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Psíí  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs3   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@^Psaà #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@^Psiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@^Psiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@^Psas2 #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs3   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs3   #;

LEXICON sii-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Psis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Psíí  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs3   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@^Psaà #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@^Psiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@^Psiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@^Psas2 #;
@R.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@^Ps3    #;
@R.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Ps3    #;
@D.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT@@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s3    #;
@D.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT@@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s3    #;

LEXICON sii-AFF-OuterPrefix
! Two 3S forms are possible here (e.g., tách'ásgàd, tách'ásiigàd "3S rode away")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@síí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sii   #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s3    #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@saà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@siì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@sas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s3    #;	
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s3    #; 


!
! yi-y-PFV
!
LEXICON yi-y-PFV
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-y@                  yi-y-PFV-AFF ;

LEXICON yi-y-PFV-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          yi-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    yi-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   yi-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    yi-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           yis-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     yis-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    yis-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     yis-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

! The only conditions under which we should expect yii-y-PFV to arise are
! after outer, middle, and inner prefixes (where they appear in reflexives
! based on yis-y-PFV verbs, which will contain middle prefixes, but possibly
! also inner prefixes that may require inner or outer-prefix TAMA chunks).
! For yi-y perfectives, however, TAMA chunk forms are the same under all
! prefixation conditions, so we tentatively include no-prefix forms here,
! as well.
@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           yii-y-PFV-AFF ;    ! CHECK
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     yii-y-PFV-AFF ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    yii-y-PFV-AFF ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     yii-y-PFV-AFF ;


LEXICON yi-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;

LEXICON yi-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;

LEXICON yi-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;


LEXICON yis-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;

LEXICON yis-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;

LEXICON yis-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;


! All yi-y TAMA chunks have the same form, regardless of what prefixes precede
! them, so defining one set of TAMA chunks here for yii-y-PFV is enough.  Note
! that the tone on 3SG, 3PL, and 4SG forms is different from yi-y-PFV and
! yis-y-PFV, with a mid, rather than a high tone (cf. TLQ-20210218).  This
! makes yii-y-PFV look more like 0-IPFV with a lexical yi- inner prefix.
LEXICON yii-y-PFV-AFF
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yii   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;


!
! yi-a-PFV
!

LEXICON yi-a-PFV
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@                  yi-a-PFV-AFF ;

LEXICON yi-a-PFV-AFF
! TODO: See if this needs to be *d-VV instead (e.g., if the reflexive form
! of yi-y-PFV is yi-a-PFV, then yes.  If that's the case, then we can
! potentially merge yi-y-PFV and yi-a-PFV and rely on VV to select the
! appropriate allomorphs)
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          yi-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    yi-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   yi-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    yi-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           yii-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     yii-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    yii-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     yii-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON yi-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;  

LEXICON yi-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;

LEXICON yi-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;  


LEXICON yii-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@yaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@yiì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;  
